
DI264−1 6

−DIAGNOSTICS AIR CONDITIONING SYSTEM
DI−1 231

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM970E)

DIAGNOSTIC TROUBLE CODE CHART
If malfunction code is displayed during the DTC check, check the circuit listed for that code in the table below
(Proceed to the page given for that circuit.)

DTC No.
(See page)

Detection Item Trouble Area Memory

00 Normal − −

11
*1

(DI−1 241)

Front roomtemperaturesensorcircuit SFront roomtemp.sensor
SHarnessorconnectorbetween front roomtemp.sensorand
A/C amplifier

SA/Camplifier

�

(8.5 min. or more)

12
*2

(DI−1 244)

Ambient temperaturesensorcircuit SAmbient temp.sensor
SHarnessorconnectorbetweenambient temp.sensorand
A/C amplifier

SA/Camplifier

�

(8.5 min. or more)

13
(DI−1 247)

Frontevaporator temperaturesensor
circuit

SFrontevaporator temp.sensor
SHarnessorconnectorbetween frontevaporator temp.sen-
sor and A/C amplifier

SA/Camplifier

�

(8.5 min. or more)

14
(DI−1 250)

Water temperaturecommunicationcir-
cuit

SWater temp.sensor
SHarnessorconnectorbetweenwater temp.sensoranden-
gine (and ECT) ECU

SHarnessorconnectorbetweenengine (andECT)ECUand
A/C amplifier

SEngine (andECT)ECU
SA/Camplifier

−

17
(DI−1 252)

Rearevaporator temperaturesensor
circuit

SRearevaporator temp.sensor
SHarnessorconnectorbetweenRearevaporator temp.sen-
sor and rear A/C amplifier

SRearA/Camplifier

RearA/Camplifier
communication data

19
*1

(DI−1 255)

Rear roomtemperaturesensorcircuit SRear roomtemp.sensor
SHarnessorconnectorbetweenrear roomtemp.sensorand
rear A/C amplifier

SRearA/Camplifier

RearA/Camplifier
communication data

21
*3

Solar sensor circuit (Open) SSolarsensor
S Harness orconnector between solar sensor and A/C amplifi

−
21

*3

(DI−1 258)
Solar sensor circuit (Short)

SHarnessorconnectorbetweensolarsensorand A/Camplifi-
er

SA/Camplifier

�

(8.5 min. or more)

22
*4

(DI−1 261)

All conditionsbelowaredetected for3
sec. or more
(a)Enginespeed:450 rpmormore
(b)Ratiobetweenengineandcompres-
sor rpmdeviates20%ormore incom-
parison to normal operation.

SCompressordrivebelt
SCompressor locksensor
SCompressor
SEngine (andECT)ECU
SHarnessorconnectorbetweencompressor locksensorand

engine (and ECT) ECU
SHarnessorconnectorbetweenengine (andECT)ECUand
A/C amplifier

SA/Camplifier

−

23
(DI−1 264)

Open inpressuresensorcircuit
Abnormal refrigerant pressure
[below 196kPa(2.0kgf/cm

2
,28psi)

over3, 140kPa(32.0kgf/cm
2

,455psi)]

SPressureswitch
SHarnessorconnectorbetweenpressureswitchandA/C

amplifier
SRefrigerantpipe line

SA/Camplifier

−



DI−1 232
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26
(DI−1 267)

Rear linlet air temperature sensor circuit S Rear inlet air temp. sensor
S Harness or connector between rear inlet air temp. sensor
and rear A/C amplifier

S Rear A/C amplifier

Rear A/C amplifier
communication data

31
(DI−1 270)

Front air mix damper position sensor
circuit

S Front air mix damper position sensor
S Harness or connector between front air mix damper position
sensor and A/C amplifier

S A/C amplifier

�

(1 min. or more)

32
(DI−1 273)

Air inlet damper position sensor circuit S Air inlet damper position sensor sensor
S Harness or connector between air inlet damper position
sensor and A/C amplifier

S A/C amplifier

�

(1 min. or more)

37
(DI−1 276)

Rear air mix damper position sensor cir-
cuit

S Rear air mix damper position sensor
S Harness or connector between rear air mix damper position
sensor and rear A/C amplifier

S Rear A/C amplifier

Rear A/C amplifier
communication data

41
(DI−1 270
DI−1 279)

Front air mix damper control servomotor
circuit

S Front air mix damper control servomotor
S Harness or connector between front air mix damper control
servomotor and A/C amplifier

S A/C amplifier

�

(15 secs. or more)

42
(DI−1 273
DI−1 282)

Air inlet damper control servomotor cir-
cuit

S Air inlet damper control servomotor
S Harness or connector between air inlet damper control ser-
vomotor and A/C amplifier

S A/C amplifier

�

(15 secs. or more)

47
(DI−1 276
DI−1 285)

Rear Air mix damper control servomotor
circuit

S Rear air mix damper control servomotor
S Harness or connector between rear air mix damper control
servomotor and rear A/C amplifier

S Rear A/C amplifier

Rear A/C amplifier
communication data

HINT:
S *1 If the room temp. is approx. −20˚ C (−4˚ F) or less, DTC 11 may be light up even though the system

is normal.
S *2 If the ambient temperature is approx. −50˚ C (−58˚ F) or less, a DTC may be output even though the

system is normal.
S * 

3 
If the check is being performed in a dark place, DTC 21 (solar sensor circuit abnormal) could be dis-

played. In this case, perform DTC check again while shining a light, such as an inspection light, on the
solar sensor. If DTC 21 is still displayed, 

S * 
4 

Compressor lock (DTC 22) is indicated only for a current malfunction. (See page DI−1 261)
there could be trouble in the solar sensor circuit.

To confirm DTC 22, preform the following steps.
(1)With theengineON,enter theDTCcheckmode.
(2) Press the R/F SW to enter actuator check mode, and set the operation to Step No. 3.
(3) Press the AUTO SW to return to DTC check mode.
(4) The DTC is displayed after approx. 3 secs.


